California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) The violation is not a chronic violation, and the operator is not a recalcitrant violator. In determining whether a violation is chronic or a violator is recalcitrant, consideration shall be given to whether there is evidence indicating that the violator has engaged in a pattern of neglect or disregard with respect to applicable requirements.

(b) Upon referral by the supervisor, a person subject to an order issued pursuant to Section
 3224.5 who does not comply with that order shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(c) Upon referral by the supervisor, a person subject to an order issued pursuant to this chapter who does not comply with that order shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for each day of noncompliance.

(d) Upon referral by the supervisor, a person who intentionally or negligently makes a false statement or representation in an application, record, report, permit, notice to comply, or other document filed, maintained, or used for purposes of compliance with this chapter, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) for each separate violation or, for
 continuing violations, for each day that violation continues.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), a person
 who intentionally or negligently violates a provision of this chapter or a permit, rule, regulation, standard, or requirement issued or promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) for each violation of a separate provision or, for continuing violations, for each day that violation continues.

(f) The civil penalty imposed for each separate violation pursuant to this section is separate, and in addition to any other civil penalty imposed for a separate violation pursuant to this section or any other law.

(g) In determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the
 extent of harm caused by the violation, the persistence of the violation, the pervasiveness of the violation, the number of prior violations by the same violator, the degree of culpability of the violation, any economic benefit to the violator resulting from the violation, the violator’s ability to pay the civil penalty amount, as determined based on information publicly available to the division, the prosecution costs associated with enforcement of this section, and any other matters the court determines justice may require.

(h) In determining the amount of a civil penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (b), the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the economic assets of the operator, owner, or property owner and whether the operator, owner, or property owner has acted in good faith.

(i) In addition to any other penalty set forth in this section, a person found liable for a civil penalty under subdivision (a), (c), (d), or (e) shall also pay a penalty in an amount equal to the cost to plug and abandon any well associated with the violation. The cost to plug and abandon any well associated with the violation is to be determined by the supervisor using any reasonable method, including, but not limited to, consideration of the factors listed in subdivision (b) of Section 3205.3 or the cost estimation criteria described in subdivision (b) of Section 3205.7, or consultation with a contractor to obtain an estimate of the cost to plug and abandon the well.

(j) Any action commenced pursuant to this section may be brought pursuant to this chapter by a public prosecutor,
 the Attorney General, or an attorney for the division or the department who shall bring the action in the name of the people of the State of California. Any actions relating to the same violation may be joined or consolidated.

(k) Fifty percent of any penalty collected under this
 section, other than penalties collected under subdivision (i), shall be paid to the agency or office prosecuting the action.

(l) Fifty percent of any penalty collected under this section, other than penalties collected under subdivision (i), shall be distributed to the division for deposit in the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account established pursuant to Section 3261.

(m) Any penalty collected under subdivision (i) shall be distributed to the division for deposit in the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account established pursuant to Section 3261.

(n) A person is not subject to a civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section and to an administrative civil penalty imposed pursuant
 to Section 3236.5 for the same act or failure to act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 5.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3236.3.

(a) When the supervisor determines that a person has engaged in, is engaged in, or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute or will constitute a violation of this chapter, or any regulation, condition of approval, order, or other requirement issued, promulgated, or executed thereunder, the supervisor may apply to a superior court for an order enjoining those acts or practices, or for an order directing compliance. Upon a showing by the supervisor that the person has engaged in or is about to engage in those acts or practices, the court may grant a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other injunctive order appropriate to the circumstances.

(b) At the request of the supervisor, an application for an
 injunctive order may be applied for under this section by a public prosecutor or the Attorney General.

(c) In any civil action brought pursuant to this section in which a temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction is sought, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that irreparable damage will occur should the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction not be issued; or that the remedy at law is inadequate, and the temporary restraining order, preliminary injunction, or permanent injunction shall issue without those allegations and without that proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 6.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3236.5.

(a) A person who violates this chapter or a regulation implementing this chapter is, at the supervisor’s discretion, subject to an administrative civil penalty as described in subdivision (b) for each violation. An act of God and an act of vandalism beyond the reasonable control of the operator shall not be considered a violation. The administrative civil penalty shall be imposed by an order of the supervisor pursuant to Section 3225 upon a determination that a violation has been committed by the person charged. The imposition of an administrative civil penalty under this section shall be in addition to any other penalty provided by law for the
 violation, except that a person is not subject to an administrative civil penalty imposed pursuant to this section and to a civil penalty imposed pursuant to Section 3236.2 for the same act or failure to act. When establishing the amount of the administrative civil penalty pursuant to this section, the supervisor shall consider, in addition to other relevant circumstances, all of the following:

(1) The extent of harm caused by the violation.

(2) The persistence of the violation.

(3) The pervasiveness of the violation.

(4) The number of prior violations by the same violator.

(5) The
 degree of culpability of the violator.

(6) Any economic benefit to the violator resulting from the violation.

(7) The violator’s ability to pay the administrative civil penalty amount, as determined based on information publicly available to the division.

(8) The supervisor’s prosecution costs.

(b) (1) (A) For purposes of this section, a “well stimulation violation” is a violation of Article 3 (commencing with Section 3150) or the regulations implementing that article.

(B) The administrative civil penalty amount for a well stimulation violation shall be not
 less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day per violation and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day per violation.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, a “major violation” is a violation that is not a well stimulation violation and that is one or more of the following:

(i) A violation that results in harm to persons or property or presents a significant threat to human health or the environment.

(ii) A knowing, willful, or intentional violation.

(iii) A chronic violation or one that is committed by a recalcitrant violator. In determining whether a violation is chronic or a violator is recalcitrant, the supervisor
 shall consider whether there is evidence indicating that the violator has engaged in a pattern of neglect or disregard with respect to applicable requirements.

(B) The administrative civil penalty amount for a major violation shall be not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation and not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation.

(3) (A) For purposes of this section, a “minor violation” is a violation that is neither a well stimulation violation nor a major violation.

(B) The administrative civil penalty amount for a minor violation shall be not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per violation.

(4) At the supervisor’s discretion, each day a major or minor violation continues or is not cured may be treated as a separate violation.

(c) An order of the supervisor imposing an administrative civil penalty shall be reviewable pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350). When the order of the supervisor has become final and the penalty has not been paid, the supervisor may apply to the appropriate superior court for an order directing payment of the administrative civil penalty. The supervisor may also seek from the court an order directing that production from the well or use of the production facility that is the subject of the administrative civil penalty order be discontinued until the violation has been remedied to the satisfaction of the supervisor and the
 administrative civil penalty has been paid.

(d) (1) The supervisor may allow a supplemental environmental project in lieu of a portion of the administrative civil penalty amount. The supplemental environmental project may not be more than 50 percent of the total administrative civil penalty amount. Any amount collected under this section that is not allocated for a supplemental environmental project shall be deposited in the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account, established pursuant to Section 3261.

(2) For purposes of this section, “supplemental environmental project” means an environmentally beneficial project that a person, subject to an order of the supervisor imposing an administrative civil penalty, voluntarily agrees to
 undertake in settlement of the action and to offset a portion of an administrative civil penalty.

(e) (1) The supervisor may establish regulations prescribing specific penalty amounts for specific violations.

(2) These regulations shall include a determination of whether the violation in question is a minor violation, a major violation, or a well stimulation violation.

(3) Penalty amounts prescribed in regulation shall not exceed the maximum civil penalty amount for the type of violation and shall not be less than the minimum penalty amount for the type of violation.

(4) When prescribing an administrative civil penalty amount by regulation, the
 supervisor shall consider the potential harm caused by the violation, the potential benefit to the violator resulting from the violation, the supervisor’s potential prosecution costs, and other relevant circumstances associated with enforcement of the requirement. When imposing an administrative civil penalty amount prescribed in regulation, the supervisor is not required to consider circumstances listed in subdivision (a).

(f) The supervisor shall adjust the maximum penalties specified in this section for inflation based on the California Consumer Price Index. The adjustment shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 7.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3236.6.

The supervisor, or the supervisor’s designee, may recover from the owner or operator all response, prosecution, and enforcement costs incurred by the division arising from the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The supervisor may request, and a public prosecutor, the Attorney General, or an attorney for the division or department as part of a prosecution or negotiation, may allege a claim for, these costs and expenditures and shall deposit any recoveries into the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account established pursuant to Section 3261.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 337, Sec. 8.   (AB 631)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3237.

(a) (1) The supervisor or district deputy may order the plugging and abandonment of a well or the decommissioning of a production facility that has been deserted whether or not any damage is occurring or threatened by reason of that deserted well or production facility. The supervisor or district deputy shall determine from credible evidence whether a well or production facility is deserted.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “credible evidence” includes, but is not limited to, the operational history of the well or production facility, the response or lack of response of the operator to inquiries and requests from the supervisor or district deputy, the
 extent of compliance by the operator with the requirements of this chapter, and other actions of the operator with regard to the well or production facility.

(3) A rebuttable presumption of desertion arises in any of the following situations:

(A) If a well has not been completed to production or injection and drilling machinery have been removed from the well site for at least six months.

(B) If a well’s production facilities or injection equipment has been removed from the well site for at least two years.

(C) If an operator has failed to comply with an order of the supervisor within the time provided by the order or has failed to challenge the order on a timely
 basis.

(D) If an operator fails to designate an agent as required by Section 3200.

(E) If a person who is to acquire a well or production facility that is subject to a purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition fails to comply with Section 3202.

(F) If an operator has failed to maintain the access road to a well or production facility site passable to oilfield and emergency vehicles.

(4) The operator may rebut the presumptions of desertion set forth in paragraph (3) by demonstrating with credible evidence compliance with this division and that the well or production facility has the potential for commercial production,
 including specific and detailed plans for future operations, and by providing a reasonable timetable for putting those plans into effect. The operator may rebut the presumption set forth in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) by repairing the access road.

(b) An order to plug and abandon a deserted well or to decommission a production facility may be appealed to the director pursuant to the procedures specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350).

(c) (1) The current operator, as determined by the records of the supervisor, of a deserted well that produced oil, gas, or other hydrocarbons or was used for injection is responsible for the proper plugging and abandonment of the well or the decommissioning of deserted production facilities. If the
 supervisor determines that the current operator does not have the financial resources to fully cover the cost of plugging and abandoning the well or the decommissioning of deserted production facilities, the immediately preceding operator shall be responsible for the cost of plugging and abandoning the well or the decommissioning of deserted production facilities.

(2) The supervisor may continue to look seriatim to previous operators until an operator is found that the supervisor determines has the financial resources to cover the cost of plugging and abandoning the well or decommissioning deserted production facilities. However, the supervisor may not hold an operator responsible that made a valid transfer of ownership of the well before January 1, 1996.

(3) For purposes
 of this subdivision, “operator” includes a mineral interest owner who shall be held jointly liable for the well and attendant production facilities if the mineral interest owner has or had leased or otherwise conveyed the working interest in the well to another person, if in the lease or other conveyance, the mineral interest owner retained a right to control the well operations that exceeds the scope of an interest customarily reserved in a lease or other conveyance in the event of a default.

(4) No prior operator is liable for any of the costs of plugging and abandoning a well or decommissioning deserted production facilities by a subsequent operator if those costs are necessitated by the subsequent operator’s illegal operation of a well or production facility.

(5) If the
 supervisor is unable to determine that an operator who acquired ownership of a well after January 1, 1996, has the financial resources to fully cover the costs of plugging and abandonment of the well or decommissioning deserted production facilities, the supervisor may undertake plugging and abandonment of the well or decommissioning deserted production facilities pursuant to Article 4.2 (commencing with Section 3250).

(6) By July 1, 2022, the supervisor shall provide to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Water and the Assembly Committee on Natural Resources the process the supervisor has established to determine that the current operator does not have the financial resources to fully cover the cost of plugging and abandoning the well or the decommissioning of deserted production facilities pursuant to paragraph (1), or for a
 previous operator pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2). The supervisor shall, in a timely manner, post the materials provided to the legislative committees pursuant to this paragraph on a public portion of the division’s internet website.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the supervisor or district deputy, at the supervisor’s or district deputy’s sole discretion, may determine that a well that has been idle for 25 years or more and that fails to meet either of the following conditions is conclusive evidence of desertion, and may order the well abandoned:

(A) The operator is operating in compliance with a valid idle well management plan that is on file with the supervisor pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3206 or
 is covered by an indemnity bond provided under Section 3204, subdivision (a) of Section 3205, or subdivision (a) of Section 3205.2.

(B) The well meets the relevant testing standards for idle wells required under the regulations implementing this chapter.

(2) The supervisor or district deputy shall provide the operator a 90-day notice of warning once a determination has been reached pursuant to this subdivision that a well has been deserted. An operator may rebut the determination, made pursuant to paragraph (1), of the supervisor or district deputy by demonstrating compliance with subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1).

(3) An order to plug and abandon a deserted well under this section due to the supervisor’s or
 district deputy’s determination of an operator’s noncompliance with either subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) may be appealed to the director pursuant to the procedures specified in Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 758, Sec. 3.   (SB 84)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3238.

(a) For oil and gas produced in this state from a well that qualifies under Section 3251 or that has been inactive for a period of at least the preceding five consecutive years, the rate of the charges imposed pursuant to Sections 3402 and 3403 shall be reduced to zero for a period of 10 years. The supervisor or district deputy shall not permit an operator to undertake any work on wells qualifying under Section 3251 unless the mineral rights owner consents, in writing, to the work plan.

(b) An operator who undertakes any work on a well qualifying under Section 3251 shall have up to 90 days from the date the operator receives written consent from the
 supervisor to evaluate the well. On or before the 90 day evaluation period ends, the operator shall file with the supervisor a bond or security in an amount specified in Section 3204, 3205, or 3205.1, in accordance with the requirements of whichever of those sections is applicable to the well, if the well operations are to continue for a period in excess of the 90-day evaluation period. The conditions of the bond shall be the same as the conditions stated in Section 3204.

(c) A party may plug and abandon a well that qualifies under Section 3251 by obtaining all necessary rights to the well. That party shall be subject to the requirements of this chapter as an operator of the well, file with the supervisor the appropriate bond or security in an amount specified in Section 3204, 3205, or 3205.1, and complete the abandonment. If the abandonment
 is not completed, the supervisor may act under Section 3226 to complete the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 18.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.1. Abandoned Wells [3240. - 3243.]

3240.

The supervisor, in cooperation with appropriate state and local agencies, shall conduct a study of abandoned oil and gas wells located in those areas of the state with substantial potential for methane and other hazardous gas accumulations in order to determine the location, the extent of methane gas and other hazardous gas accumulations, and potential hazards from the abandoned wells.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

3241.

The supervisor, in cooperation with appropriate state and local agencies, shall develop a strategy for extracting existing accumulations of methane gas and other hazardous gas from abandoned oil and gas wells in high-risk areas identified by the supervisor in order to protect the health and safety of the public. The strategy shall also provide plans for the management of methane gas and other hazardous gas from wells in high-risk areas where no accumulations are discovered in order to prevent future accumulations of methane gas and other hazardous gas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 924, Sec. 1.   Effective September 24, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

3243.

(a) On or before July 1, 2022, the supervisor shall establish a collections unit within the division.

(b) The collections unit shall be responsible for identifying persons responsible for charges under this chapter, locating assets belonging to those persons, and fully implementing all of the division’s authorities for collecting the amounts owed.

(c) (1) To the extent feasible, the division shall use existing resources and personnel in establishing a collections unit.

(2) The requirement imposed by paragraph (1) shall remain operative until January 1,
 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 707, Sec. 4.   (AB 896)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.2. Hazardous Wells and Facilities [3250. - 3258.]

3250.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that hazardous and certain idle-deserted oil and gas wells and hazardous and deserted facilities, as defined in this article, are public nuisances and that it is essential, in order to protect life, health, and natural resources that those oil and gas wells and facilities be abandoned, reabandoned, produced, or otherwise remedied to mitigate, minimize, or eliminate their danger to life, health, and natural resources.

The Legislature further finds and declares that, although the abatement of such public nuisances could be accomplished by means of an exercise of the regulatory power of the state, such regulatory abatement would result in
 unfairness and financial hardship for certain landowners, while also resulting in benefits to the public. The Legislature, therefore, finds and declares that the expenditure of funds to abate such nuisances as provided in this article is for a public purpose and finds and declares it to be the policy of this state that the cost of carrying out such abatement be charged to this state’s producers of oil and gas as provided in Article 7 (commencing with Section 3400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3251.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Deserted facility” means a production facility determined by the supervisor to be deserted under Section 3237 and for which there is no operator responsible for its decommissioning under Section 3237.

(b) “Decommission” has the same meaning and requirements, as applicable, as the definition established in Section 1760 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “Hazardous facility” means a production facility determined by the supervisor to be a potential danger to life, health, or natural resources and for which there is no operator determined by the supervisor to be responsible for its decommissioning under Section 3237.

(d) “Hazardous well” means an oil and gas well determined by the supervisor to be a
 potential danger to life, health, or natural resources and for which there is no operator determined by the supervisor to be responsible for its plugging and abandonment under Section 3237.

(e) “Idle-deserted well” means an oil and gas well determined by the supervisor to be deserted under Section 3237 and for which there is no operator responsible for its plugging and abandonment under Section 3237.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 652, Sec. 8.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3251.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3251, a well shall be deemed a hazardous well if it has been determined by the supervisor to pose a present danger to life, health, or natural resources and has been abandoned in accordance with the requirements of the division in effect at the time of the abandonment 15 or more years before the date of the supervisor’s determination that it poses such a danger.

(b) Reabandonment initiated by the supervisor shall not be affected by the timeline established in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1322, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

3252.

As used in this article, “natural resources” includes land, water, air, minerals, vegetation, wildlife, historical or aesthetic sites, or any other natural resource which, irrespective of ownership, contributes to the health, safety, welfare, or enjoyment of a substantial number of persons, or to the substantial balance of an ecological community.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

3253.

If any provisions of this article or the application thereof in any circumstances or to any person or public agency is held invalid, the remainder of this article or the application thereof in other circumstances or to other persons or public agencies shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

3254.

This article shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

3255.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the supervisor may order to be carried out, or may undertake, any of the following operations, as applicable, on any property in the vicinity of which, or on which, is located any well or facility that the supervisor determines to be a hazardous well, an idle-deserted well, a hazardous facility, or a deserted facility:

(1) Any inspection or tests necessary to determine what action, if any, would be appropriate to effectuate the purpose of this article.

(2) The abandonment of the well.

(3) The reabandonment of the well.

(4) The redrilling and production of an existing well for purposes of remedying, mitigating, minimizing, or eliminating danger to life, health, and natural resources.

(5) The drilling and production of a well for purposes of remedying, mitigating, minimizing, or eliminating danger to life, health, and natural resources.

(6) The decommissioning of hazardous or deserted facilities.

(7) Any other remedy or oilfield operation calculated to effectuate the purpose of this article.

(b) If, pursuant to this article, the supervisor orders that any operation be
 carried out with respect to a hazardous well, an idle-deserted well, a hazardous facility, or a deserted facility and that operation will, by virtue of the physical occupation or destruction of all or any part of the property or the extraction of oil or gas from the property, substantially interfere with the enjoyment of the property, the supervisor may acquire, as provided in Section 3256, a minimal interest in the property as is necessary to carry out the operation. No acquisition may be made pursuant to this subdivision unless the supervisor finds and determines that the public benefits to be derived therefrom in remedying, mitigating, minimizing, or eliminating danger to life, health, and natural resources will exceed the cost of the acquisition, irrespective of the manner in which the acquisition is to be funded.

(c) An order of the
 supervisor to carry out any of the operations listed in subdivision (a) may be appealed by the owner of the property pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 3350), except that in the case of an emergency no stay of the supervisor’s order shall accompany the appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 652, Sec. 9.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3256.

(a) The division is hereby authorized to accept, and hold for and in the name of the state, by gift, exchange, purchase, negotiation, or eminent domain proceedings, any and all property or appurtenances of every kind and description thereto, including land, leases, easements, rights-of-way, oil, gas, or other mineral rights as the supervisor determines to be required and necessary to carry out operations to effect the purpose of this article.

(b) When the division cannot acquire any such necessary property or interest therein by agreement with the owner, any such property or interest therein authorized to be acquired under this article shall be acquired pursuant to provisions of the Property Acquisition Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code); except that, notwithstanding any provision thereof, the division, in the name of and for the state, may take immediate possession and use of any property required to carry out operations to effect the purpose of this article after eminent domain proceedings are first commenced according to law in a court of competent jurisdiction, and thereupon giving such security as the court in which the proceedings are pending directs to secure to the owner of the property sought to be taken immediate compensation for the taking and any damage incident thereto, including damages sustained by reason of an adjudication that there is no necessity for taking the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

3257.

To effect the purpose of this article, the division is authorized to enter into agreements with any person, public agency, corporation, or other entity for the management or operation of property acquired or for the conduct of any operation ordered pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1090.)
-------------------------------------------

3258.

(a) The division shall not make expenditures from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund pursuant to this article that exceed the following sum any one fiscal year:

(1) Three million dollars ($3,000,000), commencing on July 1, 2018, for the 2018–19 fiscal year, and continuing for three fiscal years thereafter.

(2) Commencing with the 2022–23 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, five million dollars ($5,000,000). On a one-time basis, the division may also expend each of the following amounts:

(A) For the 2024–25 fiscal year, seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000), as a match to the dedicated General
 Fund appropriation for the 2022–23 fiscal year for the purposes of plugging and abandoning wells, decommissioning facilities, and site remediation pursuant to this article.

(B) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000), only if there is a dedicated appropriation from a fund other than the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund for the
 2026–27 fiscal year for the purposes of plugging and abandoning wells, decommissioning facilities, and site remediation pursuant to this article.

(b) (1) The expenditure limits of subdivision (a) also apply to expenditures by the division from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund pursuant to Section 3226, unless the division obtains a lien against real or personal property of the operator. If the division obtains a lien against real or personal property of greater value than the amount of the expenditure, then the amount of the expenditure shall not count against the expenditure limit of subdivision (a). If the division obtains a lien against real or personal property of lesser value than the amount of the expenditure, then only the difference between the amount of the expenditure and the value of the property counts against the expenditure limit of subdivision (a).
 Any moneys recovered by the division pursuant to Section 3226 shall be deposited in the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account, unless the moneys are recovered against expenditures that have been or will be made from the Hazardous and Idle-Deserted Well Abatement Fund.

(2) (A) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year, in any fiscal year that the division makes expenditures that are less than the amount appropriated in the annual state Budget Act or any other law related to the expenditures described in subdivision (a), the Controller shall transfer from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund to the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account, established pursuant to Section 3261, an amount equal to the difference between what was appropriated and what was encumbered pursuant to this article by the division for that fiscal year, unless there is more than two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in the
 account.

(B) Upon the order of the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer the unencumbered amount from the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund to the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account.

(c) Moneys expended pursuant to this article shall be used exclusively for plugging and abandoning hazardous or idle-deserted wells, decommissioning hazardous or deserted facilities, or otherwise remediating well sites of hazardous or idle-deserted wells.

(d) The division shall develop criteria for determining the priority of plugging and abandoning hazardous or idle-deserted wells and decommissioning hazardous or deserted facilities to be remediated pursuant to this article and performing work pursuant to Section 3226. The criteria shall consider the information required to be reported pursuant to
 subdivision (e). The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the development of criteria by the division pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) (1) (A) On April 1, 2021, the department shall report to the Legislature on the number of hazardous wells, idle-deserted wells, deserted facilities, and hazardous facilities remaining, the estimated costs of abandoning and decommissioning those wells and facilities, and a timeline for future abandonment and decommissioning of those wells and facilities with a specific schedule of goals. By April 1, 2022, the department shall report to the Legislature the location of the applicable wells and facilities, including the county in which they are located, if the information is not otherwise included in the April 1, 2021, report described in this paragraph.

(B) As part of the report required in subparagraph (A), the department shall provide recommendations to the Legislature for improving and optimizing the involvement of local agencies in the process of plugging and abandoning wells and decommissioning facilities. In drafting these recommendations, the department shall consider factors unique to each of the division’s districts, and shall consult with local agencies in developing recommendations.

(C) In collecting the information for the report required in subparagraph (A), the division shall conduct field inspections of hazardous wells, idle-deserted wells, deserted facilities, and hazardous facilities and include information in the report from the field inspections that can be used to prioritize those wells and facilities in the specific schedule of goals.

(2) On
 October 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the department shall provide to the Legislature an update on the report required in paragraph (1) that describes the total costs, average costs per well and facility, the number of wells plugged and abandoned, the number of facilities decommissioned, the total number of projects completed, and any additional wells and facilities identified by the department requiring abandonment or decommissioning. The update shall include the location, including the county, of applicable wells, facilities, and projects identified in the report.

(3) The report and update to the report required to be submitted under this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 34.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.3. Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account [3260. - 3262.]

3260.

For purposes of this article, “account” means the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account established under Section 3261.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 274, Sec. 3.   (AB 2756)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3261.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, including the expenditure limitations of Section 3258, the division shall administer and manage the Oil and Gas Environmental Remediation Account, which is hereby established in the Oil, Gas, and Geothermal Administrative Fund.
